Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1004] Annual report; executive,
managerial, and faculty salaries. The board of regents shall submit an
annual report to the legislature containing the salaries paid to all executive,
managerial, and faculty members of the university, including that paid to the
president of the university, not fewer than twenty days prior to the convening
of each regular session. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next